District of Columbia statutes.
4-251.04

Subsidies.

(a)

All subsidies established under this chapter shall be subject to the availability of appropriations. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as creating an entitlement to a subsidy for any person.

(b)

Pursuant to § 4-251.06, the Mayor shall establish by rule the amount of a subsidy a grandparent or relative caregiver is eligible to receive under this chapter; provided, that the subsidy shall be at least 66%, but no more than 105%, of the regular daily rate of the subsidy for a long-term permanent Level 1 guardianship established under § 29-6103.3 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations.

(c)

The amount of a subsidy a grandparent or relative caregiver is eligible to receive under this chapter shall be offset by any amount a grandparent or relative caregiver receives as TANF or Supplemental Security Income for the child.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-69, § 104, 53 DCR 54
Sept. 20, 2007, D.C. Law 17-21, § 3(b), 54 DCR 6835
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 502, 58 DCR 1008
Dec. 15, 2015, D.C. Law 21-40, § 2(c), 62 DCR 13746
Section 503 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided: “Sec. 503. Applicability. This subtitle shall apply as of January 1, 2011.”
Short title: Section 501 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided that subtitle A of title V of the act may be cited as “Grandparent Caregivers Program and Long-Term Permanent Guardianship Subsidies Amendment Act of 2010”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-200, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15270).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(c) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-33, Mar. 27, 2015, 62 DCR 4540, 21 DCSTAT 870).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(c) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-508, Dec. 8, 2014, 61 DCR 12717, 20 STAT 4429, 20 STAT 4429).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 502 of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Safe and Stable Homes for Children and Youth Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-69, July 9, 2007, 54 DCR 6826).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 104 of Grandparent Caregivers Pilot Program Establishment Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-278, February 22, 2006, 53 DCR 1459).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Grandparent Caregivers Program Subsidy Transfer Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Law 20-177, March 7, 2015, 62 DCR 21).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-40 substituted “grandparent or relative caregiver” for “grandparent” throughout (b) and (c).
D.C. Law 18-370, in subsec. (b), substituted “that the subsidy shall be at least 66%, but no more than 105%” for “that the subsidy shall be within 5% (no less than 95% and no more than 105%)”.
D.C. Law 17-21, in subsec. (b), substituted “within 5% (no less than 95% and no more than 105%) of the regular daily rate of the subsidy for a long-term permanent Level 1 guardianship” for “no less than the regular daily rate of the subsidy for a long-term permanent guardianship”; and, in subsec. (c), substituted “receives as TANF or Supplemental Security Income” for “receives from TANF”.